test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-48kasuma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kasuma: # Verb (48) kasuma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kasuma+V+Inf/mA: kasuma
     kasuma+V+Inf: kassuq
     kasuma+V+Act+PrfPrc: kasunuq
     kasuma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [kasut, kasutu]

     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kasu
     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [kasut, kasudõq]
     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kasus
     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kasumiq
     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kasutiq
     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kasusõq
     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: kasu
     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kasvi
     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kasvit, kasviq, kasvidõq]
     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kasvi
     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kasvimiq
     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kasvitiq
     kasuma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kasviq, kasvivaq]

     kasuma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kasutas

     kasuma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kassuv

     kasuma+V+Jus: kasuguq
